Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB113.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 527.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used[The following definitions apply] in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(1) "Booby trap device" has[shall have] the same meaning as[ set forth] in KRS
237.030;[.]
(2) "Deface" means to remove, deface, cover, alter, or destroy the manufacturer's serial
number or any other distinguishing number or identification mark;[.]
(3) "Destructive device" has[shall have] the same meaning as[ set forth] in KRS
237.030;[.]
(4) "Firearm" means any weapon which will expel a projectile by the action of an
explosive;[.]
(5) "Handgun" means any pistol or revolver originally designed to be fired by the use
of a single hand, or any other firearm originally designed to be fired by the use of a
single hand; and
(6) "Securely locked container":
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 9/11/2025 8:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 205
(a) Means a container that is fully enclosed and locked by a padlock, keylock,
combination lock, or similar locking device; and
(b) Does not include the glove compartment of a motor vehicle unless the glove
compartment can be manually locked.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 527 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person is guilty of unlawful storage of a firearm when:
(a) He or she recklessly stores or leaves a firearm in a manner that allows a
minor to have unsupervised access to a firearm that is not secured by:
1. A securely locked container;
2. A device or mechanism, other than the firearm safety, designed to
render the firearm temporarily inoperable; or
3. Carrying the firearm on his or her body; and
(b) A minor, without permission of the minor's parent or guardian, accesses the
firearm.
(2) Unlawful storage of a firearm is a Class B misdemeanor unless the minor,
without legal justification, uses the firearm in a manner that results in physical
injury, serious physical injury, or death to the minor or another person, in which
case it is a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) A person shall have an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this section if a
minor obtained a firearm through the minor's unlawful entry of any premises or
the motor vehicle where the firearm has been stored.
Section 3. This Act may be cited as the Baby Dre Gun Safety Act.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 9/11/2025 8:05 AM Jacketed